Maine, session 132, LD1716.
Be it enacted by the People of the State of Maine as follows:
Sec. 1. 22 MRSA §1912 is enacted to read:
§1912. Human growth and development curriculum
1. Definition. As used in this section, unless the context otherwise indicates, "human
growth and development discussion" means an oral, written or digital lesson, lecture or
presentation about human biology related to pregnancy and human development inside the
uterus.
2. Human growth and development discussion. A school offering comprehensive
family life education pursuant to section 1910 shall incorporate a human growth and
development discussion into its curriculum. The human growth and development
discussion must be offered to students beginning no later than grade 3.
3. Videos. A human growth and development discussion must include:
A. A high-definition ultrasound video, at least 3 minutes in duration, showing the fetal
development of the brain, heart, sex organs and other vital organs in early fetal
development; and
B. A video showing the process of fertilization and every stage of fetal development
inside the uterus and noting significant markers in cell growth and organ development
of a fetus from conception to birth.
4. Cause of action; civil suit. The Attorney General has a cause of action to sue for
damages and injunctive relief and may bring a civil suit to enforce this section on behalf of
a resident of the State against a person that violates this section.